Utah statutes.
49-11-505.   Reemployment of a retiree -- Restrictions.
(1)  For purposes of this section, "retiree":
(a)  means a person who:
(i)  retired from a participating employer; and
(ii)  begins reemployment on or after July 1, 2010 with a participating
employer; and
(b)  does not include a retiree who is reemployed as an active senior judge
appointed to hear cases by the Utah Supreme Court in accordance with Article
VIII, Section 4, Utah Constitution.
(2)  A retiree may not for the same period of reemployment:
(a) (i)  earn additional service credit; or
(ii)  receive any retirement related contribution from a participating
employer; and
(b)  receive a retirement allowance.
(3)  The office shall cancel the retirement allowance of a retiree if the
reemployment with a participating employer begins within one year of the
retiree's retirement date.
(4)  If a retiree is not subject to Subsection (3), the retiree may elect to:
(a)  earn additional service credit in accordance with this title and cancel
the retiree's retirement allowance; or
(b)  continue to receive the retiree's retirement allowance and forfeit any
retirement related contribution from the participating employer who reemployed
the retiree.
(5)  If an employee makes an election under Subsection (4)(b) to continue to
receive a retirement allowance while reemployed, the participating employer
shall contribute to the office the amortization rate, as defined in Section
49-11-102, to be applied to the system that would have covered the retiree.
(6) (a)  A participating employer shall immediately notify the office:
(i)  if the participating employer reemploys a retiree;
(ii)  whether the remployment is subject to Subsection (3) or (4) of this
section; and
(iii)  any election by the retiree under Subsection (4).
(b)  A participating employer is liable to the office for a payment or failure
to make a payment in violation of this section.
(c)  If a participating employer fails to notify the office in accordance with
this section, the participating employer is immediately subject to a
compliance audit by the office.
(7) (a)  The office shall immediately cancel the retirement allowance of a
retiree in accordance with Subsection (7)(b) if the office receives notice or
learns of:
(i)  the reemployment of a retiree subject to Subsection (3); or
(ii)  the election of a reemployed retiree under Subsection (4)(a).
(b)  The office shall cancel the allowance of a retiree subject to Subsection
(7)(a), and reinstate the retiree to active member status on the first day of
the month following the date of:
(i)  reemployment if the retiree is subject to Subsection (3); or
(ii)  an election by an employee under Subsection (4)(a).
(8) (a)  A retiree subject to Subsection (7)(b) who retires within two years
from the date of reemployment:
(i)  is not entitled to a recalculated retirement benefit; and
(ii)  will resume the allowance that was being paid at the time of
cancellation.
(b)  Subject to Subsection (2), a retiree who is re-instated to active
membership under Subsection (7) and who retires two or more years after the
date of re-instatement to active membership shall:
(i)  resume receiving the allowance that was being paid at the time of
cancellation; and
(ii)  receive an additional allowance based on the formula in effect at the
date of the subsequent retirement for all service credit accrued between the
first and subsequent retirement dates.
(9)  A retiree subject to this section shall report to the office the status
of the reemployment under Subsection (3) or (4).
(10)  The board may make rules to implement this section.
